Massachusetts, session 194th, S1531.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
Section 223 of chapter 111 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official 
Edition, is hereby amended by inserting after subsection (g) the following new subsections:-  
“(h) Beginning December 31, 2028, from the midnight before to 30 minutes after the end 
of the school day, at each public-school competitive foods and non-sweetened carbonated water 
may not be sold or provided on school grounds if they contain any of the following substances: 
A. Blue 1 (CAS 3844-45-9). 
B. Blue 2 (CAS 860-22-0). 
C. Green 3 (CAS 2353-45-9). 
D. Red 3 (CAS 16423-68-0). 
E. Red 40 (CAS 25956-17-6). 
F. Yellow 5 (CAS 1934-21-0). 

of 2 12  G. Yellow 6 (CAS 2783-94-0). 
(i) A school may permit the sale or provision of competitive foods that do not comply 
with subsection (h) of this section if the sale of such items takes place: 
A. Off and away from the premises of the school; or 
B. On school premises at least one-half hour after the end of the school day; or 
C. At booster sales, concession stands and other school-sponsored or school-related 
fundraisers and events.”